Utah statutes.
76-6-409.   Theft of services.
(1)  A person commits theft if he obtains services which he knows are
available only for compensation by deception, threat, force, or any other
means designed to avoid the due payment for them.
(2)  A person commits theft if, having control over the disposition of
services of another, to which he knows he is not entitled, he diverts the
services to his own benefit or to the benefit of another who he knows is not
entitled to them.
(3)  In this section "services" includes, but is not limited to, labor,
professional service, public utility and transportation services, restaurant,
hotel, motel, tourist cabin, rooming house, and like accommodations, the
supplying of equipment, tools, vehicles, or trailers for temporary use,
telephone or telegraph service, steam, admission to entertainment,
exhibitions, sporting events, or other events for which a charge is made.
(4)  Under this section "services" includes gas, electricity, water, sewer, or
cable television services, only if the services are obtained by threat, force,
or a form of deception not described in Section 76-6-409.3.
(5)  Under this section "services" includes telephone services only if the
services are obtained by threat, force, or a form of deception not described
in Sections 76-6-409.5 through 76-6-409.9.
